languagetool-language-modules/gl/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/gl/hunspell/gl_ES.dic
abesourar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:abesóurar
abrochar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i / < abrocho al:abróchar
achantar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:achántar
afectar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:aféctar
agoirar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:agóirar
agruar/221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:agrúar
alaparear/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:alaparéar
aloular/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:alóular
amoscar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i / moscar al:amóscar
apedar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:apédar
aquedar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:aquédar
arrastrar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:arrástrar
arrincar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:arríncar
asfixiar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr / [ks] al:asfíxiar
atrousar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:atróusar
avogar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:avógar
bafordar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:bafórdar
boquexar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:boquéxar
bular/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:búlar
cansar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:cánsar
chalanear/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:chalanéar
chorar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:chórar
colear/220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: i pr / cola3 al:coléar
contestar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:contéstar
croar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i / acocorar al:cróar
dentar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:déntar
desertar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:desértar
discursar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:discúrsar
empreñar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:empréñar
enguedellar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:enguedéllar
esbirrar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:esbírrar
esgazar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:esgázar
estoupar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:estóupar
fervellar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:fervéllar
fumar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:fúmar
gostar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i / gustar=> al:góstar
iñar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:íñar
larbear/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:larbéar
louquear/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:louquéar
melear/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:meléar
muchar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:múchar
optar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:óptar
pasar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal / auxiliar VOLG: t i pr al:pásar
perseverar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:persevérar
practicar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:practícar
puvisar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:puvísar
recalar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:recálar
remar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:rémar
retumbar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:reunifícar
sacar/200,201,220,221,230,231 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG: t i pr al:sácar
soprar/200,201,220,221 po:verbo ts:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG: t i al:sóprar
tinguilear/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:tinguiléar
tremelar/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:tremélar
valsear/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:valséar
xesticular/220,221 po:verbo ts:intransitiva VOLG: i al:xesticúlar
